Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 4. REGULATORY AND PENAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 107. TRANSPORTATION AND IMPORTATION

Sec. 107.01. TRANSPORTATION OF LIQUOR: STATEMENT REQUIRED. (a) No person may transport liquor into this state or on a public highway, street, or alley in this state unless the person accompanying or in charge of the shipment has with him, available for exhibition and inspection, a written statement furnished and signed by the shipper showing the name and address of the consignor and the consignee, the origin and destination of the shipment, and any other information required by rule or regulation of the commission.

(b) The person in charge of the shipment while it is being transported shall exhibit the statement to the commission, an authorized representative of the commission, or a peace officer on demand, and it is a violation of this code to fail or refuse to do so. The representative or officer shall accept the written statement as prima facie evidence of the legal right to transport the liquor.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 516, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 107.02. TRANSPORTATION OF MALT BEVERAGES: STATEMENT REQUIRED. (a) It is lawful for a person to transport malt beverages from any place where its sale, manufacture, or distribution is authorized to another place in the state where its sale, manufacture, or distribution is authorized, or from the state boundary to a place where its sale, manufacture, or distribution is authorized, even though the route of transportation may cross a dry area.

(a-1) A person transporting malt beverages to the premises of a distributor, including to a location from which the distributor is temporarily conducting business under Section 109.62, shall provide to the consignee a shipping invoice that clearly states:

(1) the name and address of the consignor and consignee;

(2) the origin and destination of the shipment; and

(3) any other information required by this code or commission rule, including the brands, sizes of containers, and quantities of malt beverages contained in the shipment.

(b) A shipment of malt beverages must be accompanied by a written statement furnished and signed by the shipper showing:

(1) the name and address of the consignor and consignee;

(2) the origin and destination of the shipment; and

(3) any other information required by the commission or administrator.

(c) The person in charge of the shipment while it is being transported shall exhibit the written statement to any representative of the commission or peace officer who demands to see it. The statement shall be accepted by the representative or peace officer as prima facie evidence of the legal right to transport the malt beverages.

(d) A person who transports malt beverages not accompanied by the required statement, or who fails to exhibit the statement after a lawful demand, violates this code.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 517, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 517 (H.B. 2035), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 331, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 107.03. DELIVERY OF LIQUOR IN DRY AREA. No carrier may transport and deliver liquor to a person in a dry area in this state except for a purpose authorized by this code.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 517, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 107.04. DELIVERY OF MALT BEVERAGES IN DRY AREA. A common carrier may not deliver malt beverages in a dry area unless the malt beverages are consigned to a general distributor's licensee who has previously stated that the licensee intends to transport the malt beverages to a licensed place of business in a wet area. A common carrier who transports malt beverages to a distributor in a dry area shall comply strictly with this section and Section 107.02.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 517, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 332, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 107.05. IMPORTATION OF LIQUOR. (a) No person may import liquor into the state and deliver it to a person not authorized to import it.

(b) This section does not apply to the transportation of liquor into the state as authorized by Section 107.07 of this code.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 517, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Sec. 107.06. IMPORTATION OF MALT BEVERAGES. (a) A person may not import malt beverages into the state except the holder of a brewer's or general or branch distributor's license.

(b) A person may not transport malt beverages into this state unless the malt beverages are consigned and delivered to one of the licensees named in Subsection (a).

(c) This section does not apply to the importation or transportation of military malt beverages consigned to a military installation or to the importation of malt beverages as authorized under Section 107.07.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 517, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 333, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 107.07. IMPORTATION FOR PERSONAL USE; IMPORTATION BY RAILROAD COMPANIES. (a) A person may import not more than 24 12-ounce bottles or an equivalent quantity of malt beverages, 3 gallons of wine, and 1 gallon of distilled spirits for the person's own personal use without being required to hold a permit. A person importing alcoholic beverages into the state under this subsection must pay the state tax on alcoholic beverages and an administrative fee of $3 and must affix the required tax stamps. No minor and no intoxicated person may import any alcoholic beverages into the state. A person importing alcoholic beverages under this subsection must personally accompany the alcoholic beverages as the alcoholic beverages enter the state. A person may not use the exemptions set forth in this subsection more than once every thirty days.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 157, Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 157, Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 410(a)(17), eff. September 1, 2021.

(e) The administrative fees collected under this section shall be used by the commission for the administrative costs of enforcing the requirements of Subsection (a).

(f) Except as provided by Chapter 54, any person in the business of selling alcoholic beverages in another state or country who ships or causes to be shipped any alcoholic beverage directly to any Texas resident under this section is in violation of this code.

(g) In computing the total amount of taxes and administrative fees to be collected on alcoholic beverages imported by a person into the state for personal use, the commission may round the amount up to the nearest quarter of a dollar.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 518, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 258, ch. 107, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1981; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 2212, ch. 515, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 285, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 462, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1986; Acts 1986, 69th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 9, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 30, 1986; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 495, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 135, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 36 (S.B. 877), Sec. 3, eff. May 9, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 792 (S.B. 269), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 157 (H.B. 1936), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 157 (H.B. 1936), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 410(a)(17), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 107.08. TRANSPORTATION OF BEVERAGES FOR PERSONAL CONSUMPTION. A person who purchases an alcoholic beverage for the person's own consumption may personally transport it from a place where its sale is legal to a place where its possession is legal without holding a license or permit.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 518, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 849 (H.B. 2791), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 107.09. SINGLE INVOICE AUTHORIZED. If the holder of a general or branch distributor's license also holds a wholesaler's or general class B wholesaler's permit, a written statement or invoice required as evidence of the sale of malt beverages or liquor may be on the same business form that is designed to reflect the sale of both liquor and malt beverages, if all information required by this code to be shown on a statement or invoice is reflected on the form and all other records required by this code are maintained.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 83, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 334, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 107.10. TRANSPORTATION OF WINE COOLERS OR SPIRIT COOLERS. (a) A holder of a wholesaler's or general class B wholesaler's permit may transport and sell wine coolers without a prior order if the holder complies with the provisions of this code and rules of the commission applicable to the transportation and sale of malt beverages by a holder of a distributor's license.

(b) A holder of a wholesaler's permit may transport and sell spirit coolers without a prior order if the holder complies with the provisions of this code and rules of the commission applicable to the transportation and sale of malt beverages by a holder of a distributor's license.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 83, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 335, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 107.11. IMPORTATION OF PERSONAL COLLECTION. (a) A person who is relocating a household may import, or contract with a motor carrier or another person to import, a personal malt beverage, wine, or distilled spirit collection as a part of that person's household goods.

(b) Section 107.07 does not apply to a person who is importing a personal malt beverage, wine, or distilled spirit collection under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 934, Sec. 83, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 157 (H.B. 1936), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.